Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-174
Brand inspection agency, defined.

Brand inspection agency means an agency of a state, or a duly organized livestock association of a state, authorized by state law and registered with the Packers and Stockyards Division of the United States Department of Agriculture to charge and collect, at designated stockyards, packing plants, sales barns, or farm and ranch loading points, a reasonable and nondiscriminatory fee for the inspection of brands, marks, and other identifying characteristics of livestock originating in or shipped from such state for the purpose of determining the ownership of such livestock.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 5.